Hawaii statutes.
§88-9 Employment of retirants. (a) A
retirant may not be employed by the State or by any county unless the retirant
is reenrolled in the system pursuant to this chapter, or unless the employment,
without reenrollment, is authorized by this section. A retirant whose
employment without reenrollment in the system is authorized by this section
shall acquire no service credit or retirement rights under this chapter with
respect to the employment and shall not be considered to be in service for
purposes of this chapter.

(b) Any retirant employed in violation of this
section shall:

(1) Reimburse the system for any retirement allowance
or other benefit received from the system during the period or periods of
employment in violation of this section, plus interest thereon at the rate of
eight per cent per annum;

(2) Pay the system an amount of money equal to the
employee contributions that would otherwise have been paid during the period or
periods of employment in violation of this section, plus interest thereon at
the rate of eight per cent per annum; and

(3) Contribute toward reimbursement of the system for
administrative expenses incurred in responding to the situation, to the extent
that the retirant is determined by the executive director to be at fault.

(c) Any employer that employs a retirant in
violation of this section shall:

(1) Pay to the system an amount of money equal to the
employer contributions that would otherwise have been paid for the period or
periods of employment in violation of this section, plus interest thereon at
the rate of eight per cent per annum; and

(2) Contribute toward reimbursement of the system for
administrative expenses incurred in responding to the situation, to the extent
that the employer is determined by the executive director to be at fault.

(d) A retirant may be employed without
reenrollment in the system and suffer no loss or interruption of benefits
provided by the system or under chapter 87A if the retirant is employed:

(1) As an elective officer pursuant to section
88-42.6(c) or as a member of the legislature pursuant to section 88-73(d);

(2) As a juror or precinct official;

(3) As a part-time or temporary employee excluded
from membership in the system pursuant to section 88-43, as a session employee
excluded from membership in the system pursuant to section 88-54.2, as the
president and chief executive officer of the Hawaii tourism authority excluded
from membership in the system pursuant to section 201B-2, or as any other
employee expressly excluded by law from membership in the system; provided
that:

(A) The retirant was not employed by the State
or a county during the six calendar months prior to the first day of
reemployment; and

(B) No agreement was entered into between the
State or a county and the retirant, prior to the retirement of the retirant,
for the return to work by the retirant after retirement;

(4) In a position identified by the appropriate
jurisdiction as a labor shortage or difficult-to-fill position; provided that:

(A) The retirant was not employed by the State
or a county during the twelve calendar months prior to the first day of
reemployment;

(B) No agreement was entered into between the
State or a county and the retirant, prior to the retirement of the retirant,
for the return to work by the retirant after retirement; and

(C) Each employer shall contribute to the
pension accumulation fund the required percentage of the rehired retirant's
compensation to amortize the system's unfunded actuarial accrued liability; or

(5) As a teacher or an administrator in a teacher
shortage area identified by the department of education or in a charter school
or as a mentor for new classroom teachers; provided that:

(A) The retirant was not employed by the State
or a county during the twelve calendar months prior to the first day of
reemployment;

(B) No agreement was entered into between the
State or a county and the retirant prior to the retirement of the retirant, for
the return to work by the retirant after retirement; and

(C) The department of education or charter
school shall contribute to the pension accumulation fund the required
percentage of the rehired retirant's compensation to amortize the system's
unfunded actuarial accrued liability.

(e) This section does not waive any provision
of chapter 76 or 89 that may be applicable to a position for which a retirant
is employed pursuant to this section.

(f) No later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular legislative session, the director of human resources
of the appropriate state jurisdiction or the human resources management chief
executive of each county shall submit an annual report to the legislature
detailing the employment of retirants under paragraphs (4) and (5) of
subsection (d), including the number and positions of retirants. [L 2010, c
179, §2; am L 2013, c 23, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next